District of Columbia statutes.
11-1524

Compensation.

Members of the Tenure Commission shall serve without compensation for services rendered in connection with their official duties on the Commission.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 493, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 210, Pub. L. 104-134, § 133(a)
District Charter provisions relating to compensation, see § 1-204.31.
1981 Ed., § 11-1524.
1973 Ed., § 11-1524.